Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 3
FOR-PROFIT TO FOR-PROFIT TRANSACTIONS

6-19-301. Scope of part 3.

This part 3 applies to covered transactions where the parties involved in the transaction are all for-profit entities.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 524, § 1, effective April 30.

6-19-302. Notice.

The parties to a covered transaction governed by this part 3 shall provide the notice required by section 6-19-103.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 524, § 1, effective April 30.